test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_NoExtra_apanjigan_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niapanjiganiminiibanag
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niapanjiganiminiibaning
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niapanjiganimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niapanjiganimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niapanjiganimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganiminaanibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganiminaanibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganiminaanibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganimiwaaibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganimiwaaibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganimiwaaibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganiminiibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganiminiibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganiminiibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganiminaanibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganiminaanibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganiminaanibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganimiwaaibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganimiwaaibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganimiwaaibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganiminiibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganiminiibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganiminiibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niapanjiganishinaanibanan
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niapanjiganishinaanibanag
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niapanjiganishinaanibaning
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niapanjiganishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niapanjiganishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niapanjiganishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niapanjiganishiwaaibanan
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niapanjiganishiwaaibanag
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niapanjiganishiwaaibaning
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niapanjiganishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niapanjiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niapanjiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niapanjiganishiniibanan
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niapanjiganishiniibanag
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niapanjiganishiniibaning
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niapanjiganishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niapanjiganishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niapanjiganishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganishinaanibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganishinaanibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganishinaanibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganishiwaaibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganishiwaaibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganishiwaaibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganishiniibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganishiniibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganishiniibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganishinaanibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganishinaanibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganishinaanibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganishiwaaibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganishiwaaibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganishiwaaibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganishiniibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganishiniibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganishiniibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: apanjiganensimishinaaniban
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: apanjiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: apanjiganensimishiwaaiban
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: apanjiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: apanjiganensimishiniiban
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: apanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: apanjiganenhimishinaaniban
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: apanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: apanjiganenhimishiwaaiban
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: apanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: apanjiganenhimishiniiban
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: apanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: apanjiganensimishinaanan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: apanjiganensimishinaanag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: apanjiganensimishinaaning
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: apanjiganensimishiwaaan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: apanjiganensimishiwaaag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: apanjiganensimishiwaaing
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: apanjiganensimishinian
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: apanjiganensimishiniag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: apanjiganensimishiniing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: apanjiganenhimishinaanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: apanjiganenhimishinaanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: apanjiganenhimishinaaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: apanjiganenhimishiwaaan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: apanjiganenhimishiwaaag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: apanjiganenhimishiwaaing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: apanjiganenhimishinian
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: apanjiganenhimishiniag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: apanjiganenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: apanjiganensimishibanan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: apanjiganensimishibanag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: apanjiganensimishibaning
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganensimish***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganensimish***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganensimish***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhimishibanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhimishibanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhimishibaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhimish***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: apanjiganensiminaanibanan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: apanjiganensiminaanibanag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: apanjiganensiminaanibaning
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: apanjiganensimiwaaibanan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: apanjiganensimiwaaibanag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: apanjiganensimiwaaibaning
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: apanjiganensiminiibanan
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: apanjiganensiminiibanag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: apanjiganensiminiibaning
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganensimini***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganensimini***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganensimini***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhiminaanibanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhiminaanibanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhiminaanibaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhimiwaaibanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhimiwaaibanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhimiwaaibaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhiminiibanan
